New York, session 2025-2026, A4007.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the county of Nassau is hereby authorized to accept from 3 Congregation Khal Mevakshei Hashem, Inc., an application for exemption 4 from real property taxes pursuant to section 430 of the real property 5 tax law with respect to the 2024 assessment roll, and all of 2023-2024 6 school taxes for the parcel conveyed to such organization, with such 7 parcel being located at 137 Lawrence Avenue, in the village of Lawrence, 8 otherwise known as Nassau county tax map section 40, block 90, lot 14. 9 If accepted, the application shall be reviewed as if it had been 10 received on or before the taxable status dates established for such 11 rolls. 12 If satisfied that such organization would otherwise be entitled to 13 such exemption if such organization had acquired the subject property 14 and filed an application for exemption by the appropriate taxable status 15 date, the assessor, upon approval by the Nassau county legislature, may 16 grant exemption from all taxation and make appropriate corrections to 17 the subject rolls. If such exemption is granted and such organization 18 therefore shall have paid any tax with respect to the subject rolls, the 19 governing body or tax department may, in its sole discretion, provide 20 for the refund of those taxes paid and cancel any taxes, fines, penal- 21 ties, interest or tax liens remaining unpaid. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04290-02-6